Utah statutes.
62A-11-303.5.   Application for child support services.
Any person applying to the office for child support services shall be required
to attest to the truthfulness of the information contained in the application.
The attestation shall indicate that the person believes that all information
provided is true and correct to the best of their knowledge and that knowingly
providing false or misleading information is a violation of Section 76-8-504
and may result in prosecution, case closure for failure to cooperate, or both.
